Maryland, session 2026, HB1000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–1510.1.
(d) (4) At a minimum, school mapping data produced with funding from the
Program shall:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1000*

HOUSE BILL 1000
(i) Be compatible with software platforms used by the school and
local, State, and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the school
without requiring the purchase of additional software or charging a fee to view or access
the data;
(ii) Be in a printable format and, if requested, be in a digital file
format that can be integrated into interactive mobile platforms;
(iii) Be verified for accuracy by a walk–through of the school
buildings and grounds;
(iv) Be oriented true north;
(v) Be overlaid on current aerial imagery;
(vi) Contain site–specific labeling that matches the structure of
school buildings, including:
1. Room labels;
2. Hallway names;
3. External door or stairwell numbers; and
4. Locations of:
A. Hazards;
B. Critical utility locations;
C. Key boxes; and
D. Automated external defibrillators and trauma kits;
(vii) Contain site–specific labeling that matches the school grounds,
including:
1. Parking areas;
2. Athletic fields;
3. Surrounding roads; and
4. Neighboring properties; [and]

HOUSE BILL 1000 3
(VIII) CONTAIN BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, CONTAIN
SITE–SPECIFIC LABELING THAT MATCHES FOR BODIES OF WATER IN THE 1–MILE
RADIUS SURROUNDING THE SCHOOL GROUNDS, INCLUDING BODIES OF WATER; AND
[(viii)] (IX) Be overlaid with gridded x and y coordinates.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.